Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1345.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-405, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-405. Powers and duties of the director A. The director shall adopt rules to establish minimum standards and requirements for constructing, modifying and licensing health care institutions necessary to ensure the public health, safety and welfare. The standards and requirements shall relate to the construction, equipment, sanitation, staffing for medical, nursing and personal care services, and recordkeeping pertaining to administering medical, nursing, behavioral health and personal care services, in accordance with generally accepted practices of health care. The standards shall require that a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17 medically discharge patients from surgery and shall allow an outpatient surgical center to require that either an anesthesia provider who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15 or 17 or a physician who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13 or 17 remain present on the premises until all patients are discharged from the recovery room. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the director shall use the current standards adopted by the joint commission on accreditation of hospitals and the commission on accreditation of the American osteopathic association or those adopted by any recognized accreditation organization approved by the department as guidelines in prescribing minimum standards and requirements under this section. B. The director, by rule, may: 1. Classify and subclassify health care institutions according to character, size, range of services provided, medical or dental specialty offered, duration of care and standard of patient care required for the purposes of licensure. Classes of health care institutions may include hospitals, infirmaries, outpatient treatment centers, health screening services centers and residential care facilities. Whenever the director reasonably deems distinctions in rules and standards to be appropriate among different classes or subclasses of health care institutions, the director may make such distinctions. 2. Prescribe standards for determining a health care institution's substantial compliance with licensure requirements. 3. Prescribe the criteria for the licensure inspection process. 4. Prescribe standards for selecting health care-related demonstration projects. 5. Establish nonrefundable application, initial licensure inspection and licensing fees for health care institutions, including a grace period and a fee for the late payment of licensing fees. 6. Establish a process for the department to notify a licensee of the licensee's licensing fee due date. 7. Establish a process for a licensee to request a different licensing fee due date, including any limits on the number of requests by the licensee. C. The director, by rule, shall adopt licensing provisions that facilitate the colocation and integration of outpatient treatment centers that provide medical, nursing and health-related services with behavioral health services consistent with article 3.1 of this chapter. D. The director shall establish a model in rule for the department to monitor health care institutions on-site that are found to not be in substantial compliance with the applicable licensure requirements. The director shall establish on-site monitoring fees for health care institutions that are subject to the on-site monitoring requirements. The department may not charge a fee pursuant to this subsection for a complaint or compliance-related survey or inspection if a health care institution is in substantial compliance. E. The department may provide in-service training to health care institutions that request in-service training relating to regulatory compliance outside of the survey process. The director shall establish in rule in-service training fees for health care institutions that request in-service training from the department. F. Ninety percent of the fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the health services licensing fund established by section 36-414 and ten percent of the fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the state general fund. G. Subsection B, paragraph 5 of this section does not apply to a health care institution operated by a state agency pursuant to state or federal law or to adult foster care residential settings. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 36-425, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-425. Inspections; issuance of license; posting requirements; provisional license; denial of license A. On receipt of a properly completed application for a health care institution license, the director shall conduct an inspection of the health care institution as prescribed by this chapter.  If an application for a license is submitted due to a planned change of ownership, the director shall determine the need for an inspection of the health care institution. Based on the results of the inspection and after the submission of the applicable licensing fee, the director shall either deny the license or issue a regular or provisional license. A license issued by the department shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the reception area of that health care institution. B. The director shall issue a license if the director determines that an applicant and the health care institution for which the license is sought substantially comply with the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter and the applicant agrees to carry out a plan acceptable to the director to eliminate any deficiencies. The director shall not require a health care institution that was designated as a critical access hospital to make any modifications required by this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter in order to obtain an amended license with the same licensed capacity the health care institution had before it was designated as a critical access hospital if all of the following are true: 1. The health care institution has subsequently terminated its critical access hospital designation. 2. The licensed capacity of the health care institution does not exceed its licensed capacity before its designation as a critical access hospital. 3. The health care institution remains in compliance with the applicable codes and standards that were in effect at the time the facility was originally licensed with the higher licensed capacity. C. A health care institution license does not expire and remains valid unless: 1. The department subsequently revokes or suspends the license. 2. The license is considered void because the licensee did not pay the licensing fee, civil penalties or provider agreement fees before the relevant due date or did not enter into an agreement with the department before the relevant due date to pay all outstanding fees or civil penalties. D. Except as provided in section 36-424, subsection B and subsection E of this section, the department shall conduct a compliance inspection of a health care institution to determine compliance with this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter at least once annually. E. If the department determines a facility, except for a residential care institution or a nursing care institution that does not have the same direct owner or indirect owner as a hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter, to be deficiency free on a compliance survey, the department shall not conduct a compliance survey of that facility for twenty-four months after the date of the deficiency free survey.  This subsection does not prohibit the department from enforcing licensing requirements as authorized by section 36-424. F. A hospital licensed as a rural general hospital may provide intensive care services. G. The director shall issue a provisional license for a period of not more than one year if an inspection or investigation of a currently licensed health care institution or a health care institution for which an applicant is seeking a license reveals that the health care institution is not in substantial compliance with department licensure requirements and the director believes that the immediate interests of the patients and the general public are best served if the health care institution is given an opportunity to correct deficiencies.  The applicant or licensee shall agree to carry out a plan to eliminate deficiencies that is acceptable to the director. The director shall not issue consecutive provisional licenses to a single health care institution. The director shall not issue a license to the current licensee or a successor applicant before the expiration of the provisional license unless the health care institution submits an application for a substantial compliance survey and is found to be in substantial compliance. The director may issue a license only if the director determines that the health care institution is in substantial compliance with the licensure requirements of the department and this chapter. This subsection does not prevent the director from taking action to protect the safety of patients pursuant to section 36-427. H. Subject to the confidentiality requirements of articles 4 and 5 of this chapter, title 12, chapter 13, article 7.1 and section 12-2235, the licensee shall keep current department inspection reports at the health care institution. Unless federal law requires otherwise, the licensee shall post in a conspicuous location a notice that identifies the location at that health care institution where the inspection reports are available for review. I. A health care institution shall immediately notify the department in writing when there is a change of the chief administrative officer specified in section 36-422, subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivision (g). J. When the department issues an original license or an original provisional license to a health care institution, it shall notify the owners and lessees of any agricultural land within one-fourth mile of the health care institution. The health care institution shall provide the department with the names and addresses of owners or lessees of agricultural land within one-fourth mile of the proposed health care institution. K. In addition to the grounds for denial of licensure prescribed pursuant to subsection A of this section, the director may deny a license because an applicant or anyone in a business relationship with the applicant, including stockholders and controlling persons, has had a license to operate a health care institution denied, revoked or suspended or a license or certificate issued by a health profession regulatory board pursuant to title 32 or issued by a state agency pursuant to chapter 6, article 7 or chapter 17 of this title denied, revoked or suspended or has a licensing history of recent serious violations occurring in this state or in another state that posed a direct risk to the life, health or safety of patients or residents. L. The department shall: 1. Within ninety days after receiving a complete initial application for a health care institution license, approve or deny the application. 2. Within thirty days after receiving survey results completed by a third-party accreditation organization, review and submit to the medicare administrative contractor for certification survey results that meet the requirements of the centers for medicare and medicaid services. L. M. In addition to the requirements of this chapter, the director may prescribe by rule other licensure requirements.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.